Arkansas, session 2025, HB1903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-503(a)(1)(C), concerning disciplinary
policies required for public school districts, is amended to read as follows:
(C) The discipline policy required under subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section shall include provisions for:
(i) Placement of a student with disciplinary,
socially dysfunctional, or behavioral problems not associated with a physical
or mental impairment or disability in an alternative learning environment
provided by the district, if the district provides an alternative learning
environment; and
(ii) Procedures for responding to reports received
through the school safety and crisis line under § 6-18-111.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-48-102 is amended to read as follows:
6-48-102. Alternative learning environment required — Reporting.
*TNL357*
03/19/2025 5:08:19 PM TNL357

HB1903
(a)(1) A school district shall may provide one (1) or more alternative
learning environments for all students who meet the minimum criteria
established by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(2) A school district complies with this section if the school
district provides may provide an alternative learning environment by one (1)
or more of the following methods:
(A) Establishes and operates Establishing and operating an
alternative learning environment;
(B) Cooperates Cooperating with one (1) or more other
school districts to establish and operate an alternative learning
environment;
(C) Uses Using an alternative learning environment
operated by an education service cooperative established under The Education
Service Cooperative Act of 1985, § 6-13-1001 et seq.; or
(D) Partners Partnering with a state-supported institution
of higher education and technical institutes to provide concurrent courses or
technical education options for academic learning to students in grades eight
through twelve (8-12).
(b) Annually, a school district that provides an alternative learning
environment under this section shall submit to the division:
(1) Information on race and gender of the students educated in
the alternative learning environment;
(2) Any other information regarding students educated in
alternative learning environments that the division requires by rule; and
(3) An assurance statement that the school district is in
compliance with this chapter.










03/19/2025 5:08:19 PM TNL357